Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201681-3450
Technical submissions by architect; affix seal and signature; conditions.

(1) An architect shall not affix his or her seal and signature to technical submissions that are subject to the Engineers and Architects Regulation Act unless the technical submissions were:

(a) Prepared entirely by the architect;

(b) Prepared entirely under the direct supervision of the architect; or

(c) Prepared partially by others if the architect has reviewed and integrated the work into his or her own technical submissions.

(2) An architect may affix his or her seal to technical submissions not subject to the act if the architect has reviewed or adapted in whole or in part such submissions and integrated them into his or her work.

Laws 1997, LB 622, § 50;

Laws 2013, LB7, § 3;

Laws 2015, LB23, § 46.